Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 3. Medicaid.
§ 43-13-115.
Persons entitled to receive Medicaid.

Recipients of Medicaid shall be the following persons only:

Those who are qualified for public assistance grants under provisions of Title IV-A and E of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, including those statutorily deemed to be IV-A and low income families and children under Section 1931 of the federal Social Security Act. For the purposes of this paragraph (1) and paragraphs (8), (17) and (18) of this section, any reference to Title IV-A or to Part A of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, or the state plan under Title IV-A or Part A of Title IV, shall be considered as a reference to Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the state plan under Title IV-A, including the income and resource standards and methodologies under Title IV-A and the state plan, as they existed on July 16, 1996. The Department of Human Services shall determine Medicaid eligibility for children receiving public assistance grants under Title IV-E. The division shall determine eligibility for low income families under Section 1931 of the federal Social Security Act and shall redetermine eligibility for those continuing under Title IV-A grants.

Those qualified for Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and those who are deemed SSI eligible as contained in federal statute. The eligibility of individuals covered in this paragraph shall be determined by the Social Security Administration and certified to the Division of Medicaid.

Qualified pregnant women who would be eligible for Medicaid as a low income family member under Section 1931 of the federal Social Security Act if her child were born. The eligibility of the individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the division.

[Deleted]

A child born on or after October 1, 1984, to a woman eligible for and receiving Medicaid under the state plan on the date of the child’s birth shall be deemed to have applied for Medicaid and to have been found eligible for Medicaid under the plan on the date of that birth, and will remain eligible for Medicaid for a period of one (1) year so long as the child is a member of the woman’s household and the woman remains eligible for Medicaid or would be eligible for Medicaid if pregnant. The eligibility of individuals covered in this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

Children certified by the State Department of Human Services to the Division of Medicaid of whom the state and county departments of human services have custody and financial responsibility, and children who are in adoptions subsidized in full or part by the Department of Human Services, including special needs children in non-Title IV-E adoption assistance, who are approvable under Title XIX of the Medicaid program. The eligibility of the children covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the State Department of Human Services.

Persons certified by the Division of Medicaid who are patients in a medical facility (nursing home, hospital, tuberculosis sanatorium or institution for treatment of mental diseases), and who, except for the fact that they are patients in that medical facility, would qualify for grants under Title IV, Supplementary Security Income (SSI) benefits under Title XVI or state supplements, and those aged, blind and disabled persons who would not be eligible for Supplemental Security Income (SSI) benefits under Title XVI or state supplements if they were not institutionalized in a medical facility but whose income is below the maximum standard set by the Division of Medicaid, which standard shall not exceed that prescribed by federal regulation.

Children under eighteen (18) years of age and pregnant women (including those in intact families) who meet the financial standards of the state plan approved under Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, as amended. The eligibility of children covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

Individuals who are:

Children born after September 30, 1983, who have not attained the age of nineteen (19), with family income that does not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the nonfarm official poverty level;

Pregnant women, infants and children who have not attained the age of six (6), with family income that does not exceed one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level; and

Pregnant women and infants who have not attained the age of one (1), with family income that does not exceed one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty level.

The eligibility of individuals covered in (a), (b) and (c) of this paragraph shall be determined by the division.

Certain disabled children age eighteen (18) or under who are living at home, who would be eligible, if in a medical institution, for SSI or a state supplemental payment under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and therefore for Medicaid under the plan, and for whom the state has made a determination as required under Section 1902(e)(3)(b) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended. The eligibility of individuals under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

Until the end of the day on December 31, 2005, individuals who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older or are disabled as determined under Section 1614(a)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and whose income does not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the nonfarm official poverty level as defined by the Office of Management and Budget and revised annually, and whose resources do not exceed those established by the Division of Medicaid. The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid. After December 31, 2005, only those individuals covered under the 1115(c) Healthier Mississippi waiver will be covered under this category.

Any individual who applied for Medicaid during the period from July 1, 2004, through March 31, 2005, who otherwise would have been eligible for coverage under this paragraph (11) if it had been in effect at the time the individual submitted his or her application and is still eligible for coverage under this paragraph (11) on March 31, 2005, shall be eligible for Medicaid coverage under this paragraph (11) from March 31, 2005, through December 31, 2005. The division shall give priority in processing the applications for those individuals to determine their eligibility under this paragraph (11).

Individuals who are qualified Medicare beneficiaries (QMB) entitled to Part A Medicare as defined under Section 301, Public Law 100-360, known as the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988, and whose income does not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the nonfarm official poverty level as defined by the Office of Management and Budget and revised annually.

The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid, and those individuals determined eligible shall receive Medicare cost-sharing expenses only as more fully defined by the Medicare Catastrophic Coverage Act of 1988 and the Balanced Budget Act of 1997.

Individuals who are entitled to Medicare Part A as defined in Section 4501 of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1990, and whose income does not exceed one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the nonfarm official poverty level as defined by the Office of Management and Budget and revised annually. Eligibility for Medicaid benefits is limited to full payment of Medicare Part B premiums.

Individuals entitled to Part A of Medicare, with income above one hundred twenty percent (120%), but less than one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the federal poverty level, and not otherwise eligible for Medicaid. Eligibility for Medicaid benefits is limited to full payment of Medicare Part B premiums. The number of eligible individuals is limited by the availability of the federal capped allocation at one hundred percent (100%) of federal matching funds, as more fully defined in the Balanced Budget Act of 1997.

The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

[Deleted]

Disabled workers who are eligible to enroll in Part A Medicare as required by Public Law 101-239, known as the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1989, and whose income does not exceed two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level as determined in accordance with the Supplemental Security Income (SSI) program. The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid and those individuals shall be entitled to buy-in coverage of Medicare Part A premiums only under the provisions of this paragraph (15).

In accordance with the terms and conditions of approved Title XIX waiver from the United States Department of Health and Human Services, persons provided home- and community-based services who are physically disabled and certified by the Division of Medicaid as eligible due to applying the income and deeming requirements as if they were institutionalized.

In accordance with the terms of the federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-193), persons who become ineligible for assistance under Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, because of increased income from or hours of employment of the caretaker relative or because of the expiration of the applicable earned income disregards, who were eligible for Medicaid for at least three (3) of the six (6) months preceding the month in which the ineligibility begins, shall be eligible for Medicaid for up to twelve (12) months. The eligibility of the individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the division.

Persons who become ineligible for assistance under Title IV-A of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, as a result, in whole or in part, of the collection or increased collection of child or spousal support under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, who were eligible for Medicaid for at least three (3) of the six (6) months immediately preceding the month in which the ineligibility begins, shall be eligible for Medicaid for an additional four (4) months beginning with the month in which the ineligibility begins. The eligibility of the individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the division.

Disabled workers, whose incomes are above the Medicaid eligibility limits, but below two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level, shall be allowed to purchase Medicaid coverage on a sliding fee scale developed by the Division of Medicaid.

Medicaid eligible children under age eighteen (18) shall remain eligible for Medicaid benefits until the end of a period of twelve (12) months following an eligibility determination, or until such time that the individual exceeds age eighteen (18).

Women of childbearing age whose family income does not exceed one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty level. The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph (21) shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid, and those individuals determined eligible shall only receive family planning services covered under Section 43-13-117(13) and not any other services covered under Medicaid. However, any individual eligible under this paragraph (21) who is also eligible under any other provision of this section shall receive the benefits to which he or she is entitled under that other provision, in addition to family planning services covered under Section 43-13-117(13).

The Division of Medicaid shall apply to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services for a federal waiver of the applicable provisions of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and any other applicable provisions of federal law as necessary to allow for the implementation of this paragraph (21). The provisions of this paragraph (21) shall be implemented from and after the date that the Division of Medicaid receives the federal waiver.

Persons who are workers with a potentially severe disability, as determined by the division, shall be allowed to purchase Medicaid coverage. The term “worker with a potentially severe disability” means a person who is at least sixteen (16) years of age but under sixty-five (65) years of age, who has a physical or mental impairment that is reasonably expected to cause the person to become blind or disabled as defined under Section 1614(a) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, if the person does not receive items and services provided under Medicaid.

The eligibility of persons under this paragraph (22) shall be conducted as a demonstration project that is consistent with Section 204 of the Ticket to Work and Work Incentives Improvement Act of 1999, Public Law 106-170, for a certain number of persons as specified by the division. The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph (22) shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

Children certified by the Mississippi Department of Human Services for whom the state and county departments of human services have custody and financial responsibility who are in foster care on their eighteenth birthday as reported by the Mississippi Department of Human Services shall be certified Medicaid eligible by the Division of Medicaid until their twenty-first birthday.

Individuals who have not attained age sixty-five (65), are not otherwise covered by creditable coverage as defined in the Public Health Services Act, and have been screened for breast and cervical cancer under the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention Breast and Cervical Cancer Early Detection Program established under Title XV of the Public Health Service Act in accordance with the requirements of that act and who need treatment for breast or cervical cancer. Eligibility of individuals under this paragraph (24) shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

The division shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for any necessary waivers to provide services to individuals who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older or are disabled as determined under Section 1614(a)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and whose income does not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the nonfarm official poverty level as defined by the Office of Management and Budget and revised annually, and whose resources do not exceed those established by the Division of Medicaid, and who are not otherwise covered by Medicare. Nothing contained in this paragraph (25) shall entitle an individual to benefits. The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

The division shall apply to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) for any necessary waivers to provide services to individuals who are sixty-five (65) years of age or older or are disabled as determined under Section 1614(a)(3) of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, who are end stage renal disease patients on dialysis, cancer patients on chemotherapy or organ transplant recipients on anti-rejection drugs, whose income does not exceed one hundred thirty-five percent (135%) of the nonfarm official poverty level as defined by the Office of Management and Budget and revised annually, and whose resources do not exceed those established by the division. Nothing contained in this paragraph (26) shall entitle an individual to benefits. The eligibility of individuals covered under this paragraph shall be determined by the Division of Medicaid.

Individuals who are entitled to Medicare Part D and whose income does not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the nonfarm official poverty level as defined by the Office of Management and Budget and revised annually. Eligibility for payment of the Medicare Part D subsidy under this paragraph shall be determined by the division.

The division shall redetermine eligibility for all categories of recipients described in each paragraph of this section not less frequently than required by federal law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290-38; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 37, § 8; Laws, 1976, ch. 317, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 489, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1980, ch. 508, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 483, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 421; reenacted, 1984, ch. 431; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 46; Laws, 1985, ch. 353; Laws, 1987, ch. 513, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 582; Laws, 1989, ch. 527, § 4; Laws, 1990, ch. 548, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 579, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 609, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 614, § 9; Laws, 1994, ch. 649, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 316, § 23; Laws, 1999, ch. 477, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 6; Laws, 2000, ch. 438, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 460, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 593, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 594, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 543, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 593, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 470, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 31, 2005.).

§ 43-13-115.1.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2003, ch. 543, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 21, 2003.)

[Laws, 2001, ch. 532, § 11, eff from and after June 30, 2001.]

§ 43-13-116.
Authority to determine Medicaid eligibility; agreements with state and federal agencies; administrative hearings; authority to hire employees.

It shall be the duty of the Division of Medicaid to fully implement and carry out the administrative functions of determining the eligibility of those persons who qualify for medical assistance under Section 43-13-115.

In determining Medicaid eligibility, the Division of Medicaid is authorized to enter into an agreement with the Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services for the purpose of securing the transfer of eligibility information from the Social Security Administration on those individuals receiving supplemental security income benefits under the federal Social Security Act and any other information necessary in determining Medicaid eligibility. The Division of Medicaid is further empowered to enter into contractual arrangements with its fiscal agent or with the State Department of Human Services in securing electronic data processing support as may be necessary.

Administrative hearings shall be available to any applicant who requests it because his or her claim of eligibility for services is denied or is not acted upon with reasonable promptness or by any recipient who requests it because he or she believes the agency has erroneously taken action to deny, reduce, or terminate benefits. The agency need not grant a hearing if the sole issue is a federal or state law requiring an automatic change adversely affecting some or all recipients. Eligibility determinations that are made by other agencies and certified to the Division of Medicaid pursuant to Section 43-13-115 are not subject to the administrative hearing procedures of the Division of Medicaid but are subject to the administrative hearing procedures of the agency that determined eligibility.

A request may be made either for a local regional office hearing or a state office hearing when the local regional office has made the initial decision that the claimant seeks to appeal or when the regional office has not acted with reasonable promptness in making a decision on a claim for eligibility or services. The only exception to requesting a local hearing is when the issue under appeal involves either (i) a disability or blindness denial, or termination, or (ii) a level of care denial or termination for a disabled child living at home. An appeal involving disability, blindness or level of care must be handled as a state level hearing. The decision from the local hearing may be appealed to the state office for a state hearing. A decision to deny, reduce or terminate benefits that is initially made at the state office may be appealed by requesting a state hearing.

A request for a hearing, either state or local, must be made in writing by the claimant or claimant’s legal representative. “Legal representative” includes the claimant’s authorized representative, an attorney retained by the claimant or claimant’s family to represent the claimant, a paralegal representative with a legal aid services, a parent of a minor child if the claimant is a child, a legal guardian or conservator or an individual with power of attorney for the claimant. The claimant may also be represented by anyone that he or she so designates but must give the designation to the Medicaid regional office or state office in writing, if the person is not the legal representative, legal guardian, or authorized representative.

The claimant may make a request for a hearing in person at the regional office but an oral request must be put into written form. Regional office staff will determine from the claimant if a local or state hearing is requested and assist the claimant in completing and signing the appropriate form. Regional office staff may forward a state hearing request to the appropriate division in the state office or the claimant may mail the form to the address listed on the form. The claimant may make a written request for a hearing by letter. A simple statement requesting a hearing that is signed by the claimant or legal representative is sufficient; however, if possible, the claimant should state the reason for the request. The letter may be mailed to the regional office or it may be mailed to the state office. If the letter does not specify the type of hearing desired, local or state, Medicaid staff will attempt to contact the claimant to determine the level of hearing desired. If contact cannot be made within three (3) days of receipt of the request, the request will be assumed to be for a local hearing and scheduled accordingly. A hearing will not be scheduled until either a letter or the appropriate form is received by the regional or state office.

When both members of a couple wish to appeal an action or inaction by the agency that affects both applications or cases similarly and arose from the same issue, one or both may file the request for hearing, both may present evidence at the hearing, and the agency’s decision will be applicable to both. If both file a request for hearing, two (2) hearings will be registered but they will be conducted on the same day and in the same place, either consecutively or jointly, as the couple wishes. If they so desire, only one of the couple need attend the hearing.

The procedure for administrative hearings shall be as follows:

In all group hearings, whether initiated by the Division of Medicaid or by the claimants, the policies governing fair hearings must be followed. Each claimant in a group hearing must be permitted to present his or her own case and be represented by his or her own representative, or to withdraw from the group hearing and have his or her appeal heard individually. As in individual hearings, the hearing will be conducted only on the issue being appealed, and each claimant will be expected to keep individual testimony within a reasonable time frame as a matter of consideration to the other claimants involved.

The claimant has thirty (30) days from the date the agency mails the appropriate notice to the claimant of its decision regarding eligibility, services, or benefits to request either a state or local hearing. This time period may be extended if the claimant can show good cause for not filing within thirty (30) days. Good cause includes, but may not be limited to, illness, failure to receive the notice, being out of state, or some other reasonable explanation. If good cause can be shown, a late request may be accepted provided the facts in the case remain the same. If a claimant’s circumstances have changed or if good cause for filing a request beyond thirty (30) days is not shown, a hearing request will not be accepted. If the claimant wishes to have eligibility reconsidered, he or she may reapply.

If a claimant or representative requests a hearing in writing during the advance notice period before benefits are reduced or terminated, benefits must be continued or reinstated to the benefit level in effect before the effective date of the adverse action. Benefits will continue at the original level until the final hearing decision is rendered. Any hearing requested after the advance notice period will not be accepted as a timely request in order for continuation of benefits to apply.

Upon receipt of a written request for a hearing, the request will be acknowledged in writing within twenty (20) days and a hearing scheduled. The claimant or representative will be given at least five (5) days’ advance notice of the hearing date. The local and/or state level hearings will be held by telephone unless, at the hearing officer’s discretion, it is determined that an in-person hearing is necessary. If a local hearing is requested, the regional office will notify the claimant or representative in writing of the time of the local hearing. If a state hearing is requested, the state office will notify the claimant or representative in writing of the time of the state hearing. If an in-person hearing is necessary, local hearings will be held at the regional office and state hearings will be held at the state office unless other arrangements are necessitated by the claimant’s inability to travel.

All persons attending a hearing will attend for the purpose of giving information on behalf of the claimant or rendering the claimant assistance in some other way, or for the purpose of representing the Division of Medicaid.

A state or local hearing request may be withdrawn at any time before the scheduled hearing, or after the hearing is held but before a decision is rendered. The withdrawal must be in writing and signed by the claimant or representative. A hearing request will be considered abandoned if the claimant or representative fails to appear at a scheduled hearing without good cause. If no one appears for a hearing, the appropriate office will notify the claimant in writing that the hearing is dismissed unless good cause is shown for not attending. The proposed agency action will be taken on the case following failure to appear for a hearing if the action has not already been effected.

The claimant or his representative has the following rights in connection with a local or state hearing:

The right to examine at a reasonable time before the date of the hearing and during the hearing the content of the claimant’s case record;

The right to have legal representation at the hearing and to bring witnesses;

The right to produce documentary evidence and establish all facts and circumstances concerning eligibility, services, or benefits;

The right to present an argument without undue interference;

The right to question or refute any testimony or evidence including an opportunity to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses.

When a request for a local hearing is received by the regional office or if the regional office is notified by the state office that a local hearing has been requested, the Medicaid specialist supervisor in the regional office will review the case record, reexamine the action taken on the case, and determine if policy and procedures have been followed. If any adjustments or corrections should be made, the Medicaid specialist supervisor will ensure that corrective action is taken. If the request for hearing was timely made such that continuation of benefits applies, the Medicaid specialist supervisor will ensure that benefits continue at the level before the proposed adverse action that is the subject of the appeal. The Medicaid specialist supervisor will also ensure that all needed information, verification, and evidence is in the case record for the hearing.

When a state hearing is requested that appeals the action or inaction of a regional office, the regional office will prepare copies of the case record and forward it to the appropriate division in the state office no later than five (5) days after receipt of the request for a state hearing. The original case record will remain in the regional office. Either the original case record in the regional office or the copy forwarded to the state office will be available for inspection by the claimant or claimant’s representative a reasonable time before the date of the hearing.

The Medicaid specialist supervisor will serve as the hearing officer for a local hearing unless the Medicaid specialist supervisor actually participated in the eligibility, benefits, or services decision under appeal, in which case the Medicaid specialist supervisor must appoint a Medicaid specialist in the regional office who did not actually participate in the decision under appeal to serve as hearing officer. The local hearing will be an informal proceeding in which the claimant or representative may present new or additional information, may question the action taken on the client’s case, and will hear an explanation from agency staff as to the regulations and requirements that were applied to claimant’s case in making the decision.

After the hearing, the hearing officer will prepare a written summary of the hearing procedure and file it with the case record. The hearing officer will consider the facts presented at the local hearing in reaching a decision. The claimant will be notified of the local hearing decision on the appropriate form that will state clearly the reason for the decision, the policy that governs the decision, the claimant’s right to appeal the decision to the state office, and, if the original adverse action is upheld, the new effective date of the reduction or termination of benefits or services if continuation of benefits applied during the hearing process. The new effective date of the reduction or termination of benefits or services must be at the end of the fifteen-day advance notice period from the mailing date of the notice of hearing decision. The notice to claimant will be made part of the case record.

The claimant has the right to appeal a local hearing decision by requesting a state hearing in writing within fifteen (15) days of the mailing date of the notice of local hearing decision. The state hearing request should be made to the regional office. If benefits have been continued pending the local hearing process, then benefits will continue throughout the fifteen-day advance notice period for an adverse local hearing decision. If a state hearing is timely requested within the fifteen-day period, then benefits will continue pending the state hearing process. State hearings requested after the fifteen-day local hearing advance notice period will not be accepted unless the initial thirty-day period for filing a hearing request has not expired because the local hearing was held early, in which case a state hearing request will be accepted as timely within the number of days remaining of the unexpired initial thirty-day period in addition to the fifteen-day time period. Continuation of benefits during the state hearing process, however, will only apply if the state hearing request is received within the fifteen-day advance notice period.

When a request for a state hearing is received in the regional office, the request will be made part of the case record and the regional office will prepare the case record and forward it to the appropriate division in the state office within five (5) days of receipt of the state hearing request. A request for a state hearing received in the state office will be forwarded to the regional office for inclusion in the case record and the regional office will prepare the case record and forward it to the appropriate division in the state office within five (5) days of receipt of the state hearing request.

Upon receipt of the hearing record, an impartial hearing officer will be assigned to hear the case either by the Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid or his or her designee. Hearing officers will be individuals with appropriate expertise employed by the division and who have not been involved in any way with the action or decision on appeal in the case. The hearing officer will review the case record and if the review shows that an error was made in the action of the agency or in the interpretation of policy, or that a change of policy has been made, the hearing officer will discuss these matters with the appropriate agency personnel and request that an appropriate adjustment be made. Appropriate agency personnel will discuss the matter with the claimant and if the claimant is agreeable to the adjustment of the claim, then agency personnel will request in writing dismissal of the hearing and the reason therefor, to be placed in the case record. If the hearing is to go forward, it shall be scheduled by the hearing officer in the manner set forth in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (e).

In conducting the hearing, the state hearing officer will inform those present of the following:

That the hearing will be recorded on tape and that a transcript of the proceedings will be typed for the record;

The action taken by the agency which prompted the appeal;

An explanation of the claimant’s rights during the hearing as outlined in subparagraph (vi) of this paragraph (e);

That the purpose of the hearing is for the claimant to express dissatisfaction and present additional information or evidence;

That the case record is available for review by the claimant or representative during the hearing;

That the final hearing decision will be rendered by the Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid on the basis of facts presented at the hearing and the case record and that the claimant will be notified by letter of the final decision.

During the hearing, the claimant and/or representative will be allowed an opportunity to make a full statement concerning the appeal and will be assisted, if necessary, in disclosing all information on which the claim is based. All persons representing the claimant and those representing the Division of Medicaid will have the opportunity to state all facts pertinent to the appeal. The hearing officer may recess or continue the hearing for a reasonable time should additional information or facts be required or if some change in the claimant’s circumstances occurs during the hearing process which impacts the appeal. When all information has been presented, the hearing officer will close the hearing and stop the recorder.

Immediately following the hearing the hearing tape will be transcribed and a copy of the transcription forwarded to the regional office for filing in the case record. As soon as possible, the hearing officer shall review the evidence and record of the proceedings, testimony, exhibits, and other supporting documents, prepare a written summary of the facts as the hearing officer finds them, and prepare a written recommendation of action to be taken by the agency, citing appropriate policy and regulations that govern the recommendation. The decision cannot be based on any material, oral or written, not available to the claimant before or during the hearing. The hearing officer’s recommendation will become part of the case record which will be submitted to the Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid for further review and decision.

The Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid, upon review of the recommendation, proceedings and the record, may sustain the recommendation of the hearing officer, reject the same, or remand the matter to the hearing officer to take additional testimony and evidence, in which case, the hearing officer thereafter shall submit to the executive director a new recommendation. The executive director shall prepare a written decision summarizing the facts and identifying policies and regulations that support the decision, which shall be mailed to the claimant and the representative, with a copy to the regional office if appropriate, as soon as possible after submission of a recommendation by the hearing officer. The decision notice will specify any action to be taken by the agency, specify any revised eligibility dates or, if continuation of benefits applies, will notify the claimant of the new effective date of reduction or termination of benefits or services, which will be fifteen (15) days from the mailing date of the notice of decision. The decision rendered by the Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid is final and binding. The claimant is entitled to seek judicial review in a court of proper jurisdiction.

The Division of Medicaid must take final administrative action on a hearing, whether state or local, within ninety (90) days from the date of the initial request for a hearing.

A group hearing may be held for a number of claimants under the following circumstances:

The Division of Medicaid may consolidate the cases and conduct a single group hearing when the only issue involved is one (1) of a single law or agency policy;

The claimants may request a group hearing when there is one (1) issue of agency policy common to all of them.

Any specific matter necessitating an administrative hearing not otherwise provided under this article or agency policy shall be afforded under the hearing procedures as outlined above. If the specific time frames of such a unique matter relating to requesting, granting, and concluding of the hearing is contrary to the time frames as set out in the hearing procedures above, the specific time frames will govern over the time frames as set out within these procedures.

The Executive Director of the Division of Medicaid, with the approval of the Governor, shall be authorized to employ eligibility, technical, clerical and supportive staff as may be required in carrying out and fully implementing the determination of Medicaid eligibility, including conducting quality control reviews and the investigation of the improper receipt of medical assistance. Staffing needs will be set forth in the annual appropriation act for the division. Additional office space as needed in performing eligibility, quality control and investigative functions shall be obtained by the division.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch 508, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 47; Laws, 1993, ch. 609, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 301, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1999.